Colorado, session 2026A, HB1125.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 42-1-102, add (28.6)
as follows:
42-1-102. Definitions.
As used in articles 1 to 4 of this title 42, unless the context
otherwise requires:
(28.6) (a) "ELECTRIC MOTORCYCLE" MEANS AN OFF-HIGHWAY
MOTORCYCLE THAT:
(I) IS POWERED EXCLUSIVELY BY AN ELECTRIC MOTOR AND
BATTERY;
(II) IS EQUIPPED FROM THE MANUFACTURER WITH FOOT PEGS; AND
(III) DOES NOT HAVE AN OPTION FOR PEDAL-ASSISTED POWER.
(b) "ELECTRIC MOTORCYCLE" INCLUDES AN ELECTRIC DIRT BIKE.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 42-4-1412, add (16)
as follows:
42-4-1412. Operation of bicycles, electric scooters, and other
human-powered vehicles - legislative declaration - definitions.
(16) (a) Legislative declaration. THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS
AND DECLARES THAT:
(I) OVER THE LAST SEVERAL YEARS, COLORADO HAS EXPERIENCED
-2- HB26-1125

AN INCREASE IN THE USE OF ELECTRICAL ASSISTED BICYCLES, ELECTRIC
MOTORCYCLES, ELECTRIC SCOOTERS, AND ELECTRIC SKATEBOARDS BY
MINORS ON PUBLIC ROADWAYS, SIDEWALKS, AND TRAILS;
(II) EXISTING COLORADO LAW RESTRICTS THE OPERATION OF
THESE TYPES OF ELECTRIC VEHICLES BY MINORS BASED ON AGE, HELMET
USE, GEAR COMPLIANCE, AND LOCATION;
(III) LAW ENFORCEMENT OFTEN LACKS MEANINGFUL
ENFORCEMENT TOOLS WHEN MINORS VIOLATE THE RESTRICTIONS PLACED
ON THE OPERATION OF THESE TYPES OF ELECTRIC VEHICLES;
(IV) PARENTS AND GUARDIANS FREQUENTLY PURCHASE, CONTROL,
STORE, OR MAINTAIN SUCH ELECTRIC VEHICLES AND ARE BEST POSITIONED
TO PREVENT UNLAWFUL OPERATION OF THESE TYPES OF ELECTRIC
VEHICLES BY MINORS;
(V) ASSIGNING CIVIL RESPONSIBILITY TO PARENTS AND
GUARDIANS WHO PERMIT UNLAWFUL OPERATION OF THESE TYPES OF
ELECTRIC VEHICLES BY MINORS:
(A) IMPROVES SAFETY FOR MINORS;
(B) REDUCES RISK FOR DRIVERS OF MOTOR VEHICLES AND OTHER
ROADWAY USERS; AND
(C) ALIGNS WITH EXISTING COLORADO LAW REGULATING THE USE
OF CERTAIN ELECTRIC VEHICLES BY MINORS; AND
(VI) THIS SUBSECTION (16) IS INTENDED TO BE CIVIL IN NATURE,
NARROWLY TAILORED, AND FOCUSED ON PROMOTING SAFE AND
RESPONSIBLE USE OF ELECTRICAL ASSISTED BICYCLES, ELECTRIC
MOTORCYCLES, ELECTRIC SCOOTERS, AND ELECTRIC SKATEBOARDS BY
MINORS.
(b) (I) A PARENT OR GUARDIAN COMMITS A CIVIL INFRACTION, AND
-3- HB26-1125

MAY BE PUNISHED PURSUANT TO SECTION 18-1.3-503 (1.6), IF THE PARENT
OR GUARDIAN PERMITS THEIR MINOR CHILD OR WARD TO OPERATE AN
ELECTRICAL ASSISTED BICYCLE, ELECTRIC MOTORCYCLE, ELECTRIC
SCOOTER, OR ELECTRIC SKATEBOARD:
(A) IN VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION; OR
(B) IN VIOLATION OF SECTION 42-4-221 (2), (6), OR (7), IF A POLICE
OFFICER DETERMINES THAT THE VIOLATION COULD HAVE RESULTED IN
SERIOUS BODILY INJURY, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 18-1-901 (3)(p), TO THE
MINOR CHILD OR WARD OR TO ANOTHER INDIVIDUAL.
(II) FOR A FIRST VIOLATION OF SUBSECTION (16)(b)(I) OF THIS
SECTION, A POLICE OFFICER SHALL:
(A) ASSESS AGAINST THE PARENT OR GUARDIAN A PENALTY OF
NOT MORE THAN ONE HUNDRED DOLLARS PURSUANT TO SECTION
18-1.3-503 (1.6); OR
(B) ISSUE THE PARENT OR GUARDIAN A WRITTEN WARNING OR
SAFETY NOTICE.
(III) FOR A SECOND VIOLATION OF SUBSECTION (16)(b)(I) OF THIS
SECTION WITHIN TWO YEARS AFTER THE FIRST VIOLATION, A POLICE
OFFICER SHALL ASSESS AGAINST THE PARENT OR GUARDIAN A PENALTY OF
NOT MORE THAN TWO HUNDRED DOLLARS.
(IV) FOR A THIRD OR SUBSEQUENT VIOLATION OF SUBSECTION
(16)(b)(I) OF THIS SECTION WITHIN TWO YEARS AFTER THE FIRST
VIOLATION, A POLICE OFFICER SHALL:
(A) ASSESS AGAINST THE PARENT OR GUARDIAN A PENALTY OF
NOT MORE THAN THREE HUNDRED DOLLARS; AND
(B) IMPOSE ADDITIONAL REASONABLE COMPLIANCE CONDITIONS
THAT THE POLICE OFFICER HAS AUTHORITY TO IMPOSE AND THAT THE LAW
-4- HB26-1125

ENFORCEMENT AGENCY HAS AUTHORITY TO IMPOSE AND THE CAPACITY TO
ENFORCE.
(c) (I) FOR THE PURPOSES OF SUBSECTION (16)(b) OF THIS SECTION,
A PARENT OR GUARDIAN IS PRESUMED TO HAVE PERMITTED THEIR MINOR
CHILD OR WARD TO OPERATE AN ELECTRICAL ASSISTED BICYCLE, ELECTRIC
MOTORCYCLE, ELECTRIC SCOOTER, OR ELECTRIC SKATEBOARD IF:
(A) THE ELECTRICAL ASSISTED BICYCLE, ELECTRIC MOTORCYCLE,
ELECTRIC SCOOTER, OR ELECTRIC SKATEBOARD USED BY THE MINOR CHILD
OR WARD WAS PURCHASED BY OR IS OWNED BY OR REGISTERED TO THE
PARENT OR GUARDIAN;
(B) THE ELECTRICAL ASSISTED BICYCLE, ELECTRIC MOTORCYCLE,
ELECTRIC SCOOTER, OR ELECTRIC SKATEBOARD IS PRIMARILY STORED AT
THE RESIDENCE OF THE PARENT OR GUARDIAN; OR
(C) THE PARENT OR GUARDIAN KNEW OR REASONABLY SHOULD
HAVE KNOWN THAT THE MINOR CHILD OR WARD WAS OPERATING THE
ELECTRICAL ASSISTED BICYCLE, ELECTRIC MOTORCYCLE, ELECTRIC
SCOOTER, OR ELECTRIC SKATEBOARD.
(II) A PARENT OR GUARDIAN MAY REBUT THE PRESUMPTION
DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (16)(c)(I) OF THIS SECTION IF THE PARENT OR
GUARDIAN CAN DEMONSTRATE THAT:
(A) THE ELECTRICAL ASSISTED BICYCLE, ELECTRIC MOTORCYCLE,
ELECTRIC SCOOTER, OR ELECTRIC SKATEBOARD WAS TAKEN BY THE MINOR
CHILD OR WARD WITHOUT THE PARENT'S OR GUARDIAN'S PERMISSION;
(B) REASONABLE STEPS WERE TAKEN TO PREVENT THE MINOR
CHILD'S OR WARD'S ACCESS TO THE ELECTRICAL ASSISTED BICYCLE,
ELECTRIC MOTORCYCLE, ELECTRIC SCOOTER, OR ELECTRIC SKATEBOARD;
(C) THE ELECTRICAL ASSISTED BICYCLE, ELECTRIC MOTORCYCLE,
-5- HB26-1125

ELECTRIC SCOOTER, OR ELECTRIC SKATEBOARD WAS COMPLIANT AND
APPROPRIATE FOR THE MINOR CHILD OR WARD AT THE TIME OF PURCHASE
OR REGISTRATION AND ANY MODIFICATION MADE TO THE VEHICLE THAT
MAKES THE MINOR CHILD'S OR WARD'S USE OF THE VEHICLE A VIOLATION
OF THIS SECTION WAS MADE WITHOUT THE PARENT'S OR GUARDIAN'S
KNOWLEDGE; OR
(D) THE MINOR CHILD OR WARD CIRCUMVENTED ACCESS
CONTROLS OR SAFEGUARDS THE PARENT OR GUARDIAN BELIEVED TO BE IN
PLACE WITHOUT THE PARENT'S OR GUARDIAN'S CONSENT.
(d) THIS SUBSECTION (16) IS NOT INTENDED TO:
(I) CREATE CRIMINAL LIABILITY; OR
(II) ALTER THE REGULATION OF ADULT OPERATION OF ELECTRICAL
ASSISTED BICYCLES, ELECTRIC MOTORCYCLES, ELECTRIC SCOOTERS, OR
ELECTRIC SKATEBOARDS.
(e) Definitions. AS USED IN THIS SUBSECTION (16), UNLESS THE
CONTEXT OTHERWISE REQUIRES:
(I) "GUARDIAN" MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS ENTRUSTED BY
LAW WITH THE CARE OF A MINOR.
(II) "MINOR" OR "MINOR CHILD" MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL UNDER
EIGHTEEN YEARS OLD.
(III) "WARD" MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL FOR WHOM A GUARDIAN HAS
BEEN APPOINTED.
SECTION 3. Act subject to petition - effective date -
applicability. (1) This act takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following
the expiration of the ninety-day period after final adjournment of the
general assembly (August 12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13,
2026); except that, if a referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1
-6- HB26-1125

(3) of article V of the state constitution against this act or an item, section,
or part of this act within such period, then the act, item, section, or part
will not take effect unless approved by the people at the general election
to be held in November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the
date of the official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
(2) This act applies to conduct occurring on or after the applicable
effective date of this act.
-7- HB26-1125